Hawaii, session 2026, GM1157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 76-16, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows:
"(b) The civil service to which this chapter applies shall
comprise all positions in the State now existing or hereafter
established and embrace all personal services performed for the
State, except the following:
(1) Commissioned and enlisted personnel of the Hawaii
National Guard and positions in the Hawaii National
Guard that are required by state or federal laws or
regulations or orders of the National Guard to be
filled from those commissioned or enlisted personnel;
(2) Positions filled by persons employed by contract where
the director of human resources development has
certified that the service is special or unique or is
essential to the public interest and that, because of
circumstances surrounding its fulfillment, personnel
to perform the service cannot be obtained through
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO. --
C.D, 1
normal civil service recruitment procedures. Any
contract may be for any period not exceeding one year;
(3) Positions that must be filled without delay to comply
with a court order or decree if the director
determines that recruitment through normal recruitment
civil service procedures would result in delay or
noncompliance, such as the Felix-Cayetano consent
decree;
(4) Positions filled by the legislature or by either house
or any committee thereof;
(5) Employees in the office of the governor and office of
the lieutenant governor, and household employees at
Washington Place;
(6) Positions filled by popular vote;
(7) Department heads, officers, and members of any board,
commission, or other state agency whose appointments
are made by the governor or are required by law to be
confirmed by the senate;
(8) Judges, referees, receivers, masters, jurors, notaries
public, land court examiners, court commissioners, and
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO 2
iiiiHiHiliiiiniiiiiiii

Page 3
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
attorneys appointed by a state court for a special
temporary service;
(9) One bailiff for the chief justice of the supreme court
who shall have the powers and duties of a court
officer and bailiff under section 606-14; one
secretary or clerk for each justice of the supreme
court, each judge of the intermediate appellate court,
and each judge of the circuit court; one secretary for
the judicial council; one deputy administrative
director of the courts; three law clerks for the chief
justice of the supreme court, two law clerks for each
associate justice of the supreme court and each judge
of the intermediate appellate court, one law clerk for
each judge of the circuit court, two additional law
clerks for the civil administrative judge of the
circuit court of the first circuit, two additional law
clerks for the criminal administrative judge of the
circuit court of the first circuit, one additional law
clerk for the senior judge of the family court of the
first circuit, two additional law clerks for the civil
motions judge of the circuit court of the first
2026-3434 HB1541 GDI HMSO 3

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
circuit, two additional law clerks for the criminal
motions judge of the circuit court of the first
circuit, and two law clerks for the administrative
judge of the district court of the first circuit; and
one private secretary for the administrative director
of the courts, the deputy administrative director of
the courts, each department head, each deputy or first
assistant, and each additional deputy, or assistant
deputy, or assistant defined in paragraph (16);
(10) First deputy and deputy attorneys general, the
administrative services manager of the department of
the attorney general, one secretary for the
administrative services manager, an administrator and
any support staff for the criminal and juvenile
justice resources coordination functions, and law
clerks;
(11) (A) Teachers, principals, vice-principals, complex
area superintendents, deputy and assistant
superintendents, other certificated personnel,
and no more than twenty noncertificated
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO 4
luiMBiimiiiMiniiniii

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
administrative, professional, and technical
personnel not engaged in instructional work;
(B) Effective July 1, 2003, teaching assistants,
educational assistants, bilingual or bicultural
school-home assistants, school psychologists,
psychological examiners, speech pathologists,
athletic health care trainers, alternative school
work study assistants, alternative school
educational or supportive services specialists,
alternative school project coordinators, and
communications aides in the department of
education;
(C) The special assistant to the state librarian and
one secretary for the special assistant to the
state librarian; and
(D) Members of the faculty of the university of
Hawaii, including research workers, extension
agents, personnel engaged in instructional work,
and administrative, professional, and technical
personnel of the university;
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO

Page 6
H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(12) Employees engaged in special, research, or
demonstration projects approved by the governor;
(13) (A) Positions filled by inmates, patients of state
institutions, and persons with severe physical or
mental disabilities participating in the work
experience training programs;
(B) Positions filled with students in accordance with
guidelines for established state employment
programs; and
(C) Positions that provide work experience training
or temporary public service employment that are
filled by persons entering the workforce or
persons transitioning into other careers under
programs such as the federal Workforce Investment
Act of 1998, as amended, or the Senior Community
Service Employment Program of the Employment and
Training Administration of the United States
Department of Labor, or under other similar state
programs;
(14) A custodian or guide at lolani Palace, the Royal
Mausoleum, and Hulihee Palace;
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO 6
iiiiNiiiiiiiniiHiiiiiiHni

Page 7 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(15) Positions filled by persons employed on a fee,
contract, or piecework basis, who may lawfully perform
their duties concurrently with their private business
or profession or other private employment and whose
duties require only a portion of their time, if it is
impracticable to ascertain or anticipate the portion
of time to be devoted to the service of the State;
(16) Positions of first deputies or first assistants of
each department head appointed under or in the manner
provided in section 6, article V, of the Hawaii State
Constitution; three additional deputies or assistants
either in charge of the highways, harbors, and
airports divisions or other functions within the
department of transportation as may be assigned by the
director of transportation, with the approval of the
governor; one additional deputy in the department of
human services either in charge of welfare or other
functions within the department as may be assigned by
the director of human services; four additional
deputies in the department of health, each in charge
of one of the following: behavioral health,
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO 7
niiiiiHuiiiiiiiniiiiniiii

Page 8
H.B. NO. --
g
I. . I ’I
C.D. 1
environmental health, hospitals, and health resources
administration, including other functions within the
department as may be assigned by the director of
health, with the approval of the governor; two
additional deputies in charge of the law enforcement
programs, administration, or other functions within
the department of law enforcement as may be assigned
by the director of law enforcement, with the approval
of the governor; three additional deputies each in
charge of the correctional institutions,
rehabilitation services and programs, and
administration or other functions within the
department of corrections and rehabilitation as may be
assigned by the director of corrections and
rehabilitation, with the approval of the governor; two
administrative assistants to the state librarian; and
an administrative assistant to the superintendent of
education;
(17) Positions specifically exempted from this part by any
other law; provided that:
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO 8
iiiHHiiiiiiininMiiiiiii

Page 9 H.B. NO.
"
h
C.D. 1
(A) Any exemption created after July 1, 2014, shall
expire three years after its enactment unless
affirmatively extended by an act of the
legislature; and
(B) All of the positions defined by paragraph (9)
shall be included in the position classification
plan;
(18) Positions in the state foster grandparent program and
positions for temporary employment of senior citizens
in occupations in which there is a severe personnel
shortage or in special projects;
(19) Household employees at the official residence of the
president of the university of Hawaii;
(20) Employees in the department of education engaged in
the supervision of students during meal periods in the
distribution, collection, and counting of meal
tickets, and in the cleaning of classrooms after
school hours on a less than half-time basis;
(21) Employees hired under the tenant hire program of the
Hawaii public housing authority; provided that no more
than twenty-six per cent of the authority's workforce
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO

Page 10
H.B. NO. E
C.D. 1
in any housing project maintained or operated by the
authority shall be hired under the tenant hire
program;
(22) Positions of the federally funded expanded food and
nutrition program of the university of Hawaii that
require the hiring of nutrition program assistants who
live in the areas they serve;
(23) Positions filled by persons with severe disabilities
who are certified by the state vocational
rehabilitation office that they are able to perform
safely the duties of the positions;
(24) The sheriff;
(25) A gender and other fairness coordinator hired by the
judiciary;
(26) Positions in the Hawaii National Guard youth and adult
education programs;
(27) In the Hawaii state energy office in the department of
business, economic development, and tourism, all
energy program managers, energy program specialists,
energy program assistants, and energy analysts;
2026-3434 HB1541 GDI HMSO 10

Page 11 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
(28) Administrative appeals hearing officers in the
department of human services;
(29) In the Med-QUEST division of the department of human
services, the division administrator, finance officer,
health care services branch administrator, medical
director, and clinical standards administrator;
(30) In the director's office of the department of human
services, the enterprise officer, information security
and privacy compliance officer, security and privacy
compliance engineer, security and privacy compliance
analyst, information technology implementation
manager, assistant information technology
implementation manager, resource manager, community or
project development director, policy director, special
assistant to the director, and limited English
proficiency project manager or coordinator;
(31) The Alzheimer's disease and related dementia services
coordinator in the executive office on aging;
(32) In the Hawaii emergency management agency, the
executive officer, public information officer, civil
defense administrative officer, branch chiefs, and
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO 1

Page 12
H.B. NO. -
C.D. 1
emergency operations center state warning point
personnel; provided that for state warning point
personnel, the director shall determine that
recruitment through normal civil service recruitment
procedures would result in delay or noncompliance;
(33) The executive director and seven full-time
administrative positions of the school facilities
authority;
(34) Positions in the Mauna Kea stewardship and oversight
authority;
(35) In the office of homeland security of the department
of law enforcement, the statewide interoperable
communications coordinator;
(36) In the social services division of the department of
human services, the business technology analyst;
(37) The executive director and staff of the 911 board;
(38) The software developer supervisor and senior software
developers in the department of taxation;
(39) In the department of law enforcement, five Commission
on Accreditation for Law Enforcement Agencies, Inc.,
coordinator positions;
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO
IIIMilllllllllllllMlilil

Page 13
H.B. NO. -"2
C.D. 1
(40) The state fire marshal and deputy state fire marshal
in the office of the state fire marshal;
(41) The administrator for the law enforcement standards
board;
(42) In the office of the director of taxation, the data
privacy officer and tax business analysts; [and
+] (43) [-]-]All positions filled by the Hawaii tourism authority
within the department of business, economic
development, and tourism[—]£
(44) In the developmental disabilities division of the
department of health, the federal initiatives
operations coordinator; and
(45) In the Hawaii state hospital, five associate
administrators, two project managers, one security
manager, two security officers, one building manager,
and two investigators.
The director shall determine the applicability of this
section to specific positions.
Nothing in this section shall be deemed to affect the civil
service status of any incumbent as it existed on July 1, 1955."
2026-3434 HB1541 GDI HMSO 13
inniiiiiiiiiiiiHiiiiwiii

Page 14 H.B. NO. E
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 334-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§334-4 Personnel for mental health program. The director
shall appoint professional and nonprofessional staff as the
director deems necessary to carry out the state mental health
program and for which appropriations are available. Positions
for psychiatrists are exempted from chapter 76. The director
may employ psychiatrists as needed by the department on a
contractual basis, subject to the approval of the governor. The
director may appoint an administrator, [ttH?ee] five associate
administrators, a director of psychosocial rehabilitation, a
chief of the department of nursing, a risk manager, a patients'
rights advisor, two project managers, and a facilities plant
engineer for the state hospital or a secure psychiatric
rehabilitation facility established pursuant to this chapter and
these positions shall be exempt from chapter 76."
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the
department of health shall convert to civil service the security
manager, two security officer, building manager, and two
investigator positions within the Hawaii state hospital exempted
from civil service pursuant to section 76-16(b) (45), Hawaii
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO 1
lowiiiiiiiMiininiHin

Page 15 H.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
Revised Statutes, as amended by section 1 of this Act, by no
later than June 30, 2031; provided that if there is an incumbent
employee within any of these positions, a civil service class
shall exist without change in the incumbent employee's job
duties or specifications; provided further that the incumbent
employee shall experience no loss in position, rights and
benefits, or salary due to the conversion of the position to
civil service.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-3434 HB1541 CDl HMSO 15
iNHOiiiiiiiiiiinHiiniw

H.B. NO.
-’2
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 28th day of May ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1541, HD 2, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1541, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
167-26